hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Oprema za čišćenje kućanstva > Sredstva za čišćenje kućanstva: Višenamjenska sredstva za čišćenje; Sredstva za čišćenje tepiha; Sredstva za uklanjanje kamenca i tvrdokornog kamenca; Deterdženti i sapuni za posuđe; Sredstva za čišćenje perilice posuđa; Sredstva za čišćenje tkanine i tapecirunga; Sredstva za čišćenje podova; Sredstva za čišćenje i poliranje namještaja; Sredstva za čišćenje stakla i površina; Dezinficijensi za kućanstvo; Sredstva za čišćenje pećnica i roštilja; Sredstva za uklanjanje mirisa i mrlja od kućnih ljubimaca; Sredstva za ispiranje; Sredstva za čišćenje i poliranje nehrđajućeg čelika; Sredstva za čišćenje WC školjke; Sredstva za čišćenje kada i pločica; Sredstva za čišćenje perilice rublja
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Rengjøringsmidler for husbruk > Rengjøringsprodukter for hjemmebruk: Universale rengjøringsmidler; Tepperensere; Avkalkingsmiddel; Oppvaskmiddel og -såpe; Oppvaskmaskinrens; Stoff- og trekkrens; Gulvrenseprodukter; Møbelrens og -polering; Glass- og overflaterens; Desinfeksjonsmidler for hjemmebruk; Ovn- og grillrens; Fjerning av husdyrlukt og -flekker; Skyllemidler; Rengjørings- og poleringsmidler for rustfritt stål; Toalettrengjøringsmidler; Badekar- og flisrens; Vaskemaskinrens
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Gospodinjska čistila > Gospodinjska čistila: Univerzalna čistila; Čistila za preproge; Sredstva za odstranjevanje vodnega kamna in apnenca; Sredstva za pomivanje posode in mila; Čistila za pomivalni stroj; Čistila za tkanine in oblazinjenje; Izdelki za čiščenje tal; Čistila in loščila za pohištvo; Čistila za steklo in površine; Gospodinjska razkužila; Čistila za pečice in žare; Sredstva za odstranjevanje vonjav in madežev hišnih ljubljenčkov; Sredstva za izpiranje; Čistila in loščila za nerjavno jeklo; Čistila za straniščne školjke; Čistila za kopalno kad in ploščice; Čistila za pralne stroje
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 居家清潔用品 > 家用清潔產品: 萬用清潔劑; 地毯清潔劑; 除垢器/脫鈣液; 洗碗劑; 洗碗機清潔劑; 布料/沙發清潔劑; 地板清潔產品; 家具清潔養護產品; 玻璃/表面清潔劑; 居家消毒用品; 烤爐清潔劑; 環境去污除臭噴劑; 光潔劑; 不鏽鋼清潔劑/拋光劑; 馬桶清潔劑; 浴缸/磁磚清潔劑; 洗衣機清潔劑
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Produse de curățare pentru casă > Produse de curățenie pentru casă: Produse de curățat universale; Produse de curățat covoare; Produse de îndepărtare a depunerilor de calcar; Detergent și săpun pentru vase; Produse de curățare pentru mașina de spălat vase; Produse pentru curățat țesăturile și tapițeria; Produse pentru curățarea pardoselilor; Produse de curățat și lustruit mobila; Produse de curățat pentru sticlă și suprafețe; Dezinfectanți de uz casnic; Produse de curățat pentru cuptoare și grătare; Soluții pentru îndepărtarea mirosurilor și petelor cauzate de animale de companie; Produse de clătire; Produse de curățat și lustruit oțel inoxidabil; Produse de curățat pentru vase de toaletă; Produse de curățat căzi de baie și gresie; Produse de curățat pentru mașina de spălat
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Háztartási tisztítókellékek > Háztartási tisztítótermékek: Univerzális tisztítók; Szőnyegtisztítók; Vízkőmentesítők és vízkőoldók; Mosogatószer és szappan; Mosogatógép-tisztítók; Szövet- és kárpittisztítók; Padlótisztító termékek; Bútortisztítók és fényezők; Üveg- és felülettisztítók; Háztartási fertőtlenítőszerek; Sütő- és grilltisztítók; Kisállat szag- és folteltávolítók; Öblítőszerek; Rozsdamentesacél-tisztítók és fényezők; WC-csésze-tisztítók; Kád- és csempetisztítók; Mosógéptisztítók
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 가정용 청소물품 > 가정용 세제: 다목적 세정제; 카펫용 세제; 물때/석회질 제거기; 주방 세제/비누; 식기세척기용 세제; 패브릭/커버 클리너; 바닥 청소 제품; 가구 세정제/광택제; 유리/표면 세정제; 가정용 살균제; 오븐/그릴 세정제; 반려동물 냄새/얼룩 제거제; 린스 에이드; 스테인리스 세정제/광택제; 변기 세정제; 욕조/타일 세정제; 세탁조 세정제
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Nettoyage maison > Produits de nettoyage pour la maison: Produits nettoyants multi-usages; Shampouineuses pour moquette; Détartrants et décalcificateurs; Savon et détergent à vaisselle; Produits nettoyants pour lave-vaisselle; Produits d’entretien pour tissus et textiles d’ameublement; Produits de nettoyage des sols; Produits nettoyants et cirages pour meubles; Produits nettoyants pour vitres et surfaces vitrées; Désinfectants ménagers; Nettoyants pour fours et grils; Désodorisants et détachants pour animaux de compagnie; Produits de rinçage; Produits d’entretien et de polissage de l’acier inoxydable; Produits nettoyants pour cuvettes WC; Produits nettoyants pour baignoire et carrelage salle de bain; Produits nettoyants pour lave-linge
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Artykuły domowe do sprzątania > Środki czyszczące do gospodarstwa domowego: Uniwersalne środki czyszczące; Środki czyszczące do dywanów; Odkamieniacze i odwapniacze; Płyny do mycia naczyń i mydła; Środki do czyszczenia zmywarek; Środki do czyszczenia tkanin i obić; Produkty do czyszczenia podłóg; Środki do czyszczenia i polerowania mebli; Środki do czyszczenia powierzchni szklanych; Środki dezynfekujące do gospodarstwa domowego; Środki do czyszczenia piekarnika; Neutralizatory zapachów zwierzęcych i wywabiacze plam; Środki nabłyszczające; Środki do czyszczenia i polerowania stali nierdzewnej; Środki do czyszczenia toalet; Środki do czyszczenia wanien i ceramiki; Środki czyszczące do pralek
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Siivoustarvikkeet > Kodin siivoustuotteet: Yleispuhdistusaineet; Matonpuhdistusaineet; Saostumien poistoaineet ja kalkinpoistoaineet; Käsitiskiaine ja saippua; Astianpesukoneen puhdistusaineet; Tekstiilin ja verhoilun puhdistusaineet; Lattianpuhdistusaineet; Huonekalujen puhdistus- ja kiillotusaineet; Lasin ja pintojen puhdistusaineet; Kodin desinfiointiaineet; Uunin ja grillin puhdistusaineet; Lemmikin hajujen ja tahrojen poistoaine; Huuhtelukirkasteet; Ruostumattoman teräksen puhdistus- ja kiillotusaineet; Vessanpesuaineet; Pesualtaan ja kaakelien puhdistusaineet; Pesukoneen puhdistusaineet
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Schoonmaakmiddelen voor het huishouden > Schoonmaakmiddelen voor in huis: Allesreinigers; Vloerbedekkingsreinigers; Waterontharders en ontkalkingsmiddelen; Afwasmiddel en zeep; Vaatwasmachinereinigers; Textiel- en bekledingsreinigers; Schoonmaakmiddelen voor vloeren; Meubelreiniging en wrijfmiddelen; Glas- en oppervlaktereinigers; Ontsmettingsmiddelen voor woningen; Oven- en grillreinigers; Verwijderaars voor vlekken en dierengeur; Spoelmiddelen; Rvs-reinigers en -poetsmiddelen; Toiletreinigers; Schoonmaakmiddelen voor badkuip en tegels; Wasmachinereinigers
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 家居清洁用品 > 家居清洁产品: 多功能清洁剂; 地毯清洁剂; 除垢机/脱钙器; 餐具清洁剂; 洗碗机清洁剂; 纤维织物/垫衬物清洗剂; 地板清洁产品; 家具清洁剂/上光剂; 玻璃与硬表面清洁剂; 家居消毒剂; 烤箱与烤架清洁剂; 宠物除臭剂与去污剂; 亮碟剂; 不锈钢清洁剂/上光剂; 抽水马桶清洁剂; 浴缸/淋浴/瓷砖清洁剂; 洗衣机清洁剂
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Бытовые чистящие средства и инвентарь для уборки > Бытовые чистящие средства: Универсальные чистящие средства; Чистящие средства для ковров; Средства от накипи; Средства для мытья посуды; Чистящие средства для посудомоечных машин; Чистящие средства для ткани и обивки; Средства для мытья полов; Средства для чистки и полировки мебели; Чистящие средства для стекол и гладких поверхностей; Бытовые дезинфицирующие средства; Чистящие средства для духовок и грилей; Средства для удаления запаха и пятен от животных; Ополаскиватели для посудомоечных машин; Средства для чистки и полировки нержавеющей стали; Чистящие средства для унитазов; Чистящие средства для ванн и плитки; Чистящие средства для стиральных машин
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Materiais para limpeza doméstica > Produtos para limpeza doméstica: Para todos os tipos de limpeza; Limpadores de carpete; Produtos de limpeza desincrustantes e descalcificadores; Sabão e detergente para louças; Limpadores para lava-louças; Limpadores de tecidos e estofados; Produtos para limpeza de pisos; Limpadores e polidores de mobiliário; Limpadores de superfície e vidros; Desinfetantes domésticos; Limpadores de forno e grelha; Removedores de odor e manchas para animais de estimação; Secante abrilhantador; Limpadores e polidores para aço inoxidável; Limpadores para vaso sanitário; Limpadores para banheiras e azulejos; Limpadores para máquinas de lavar roupa
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Household Cleaning Supplies > Household Cleaning Products: All-Purpose Cleaners; Carpet Cleaners; Descalers & Decalcifiers; Dish Detergent & Soap; Dishwasher Cleaners; Fabric & Upholstery Cleaners; Floor Cleaning Products; Furniture Cleaners & Polish; Glass & Surface Cleaners; Household Disinfectants; Oven & Grill Cleaners; Pet Odor & Stain Removers; Rinse Aids; Stainless Steel Cleaners & Polishes; Toilet Bowl Cleaners; Tub & Tile Cleaners; Washing Machine Cleaners
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Articoli pulizia casa > Prodotti pulizia casa: Prodotti di pulizia multiuso; Detergenti tappeti; Disincrostatori e decalcificatori; Detersivo e sapone piatti; Detersivi per lavastoviglie; Prodotti per la pulizia di tessuti e tappezzerie; Prodotti per la pulizia dei pavimenti; Detergenti e lucidi per mobili; Detergenti vetri e superfici; Disinfettanti domestici; Pulizia forno e grill; Prodotti elimina odori animali e smacchiatori; Brillantanti; Prodotti per pulizia e lucidatura di acciaio inossidabile; Prodotti pulizia water; Pulizia vasche e piastrelle; Prodotti per la pulizia della lavastoviglie
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Reinigungsutensilien > Haushaltsreiniger: Allzweckreiniger; Teppichreiniger; Entkalkungsmittel; Geschirrspülmittel & -seifen; Spülmaschinenreiniger; Textil- & Polsterreiniger; Bodenreinigungsprodukte; Möbelreiniger & -Politur; Glas- & Oberflächenreiniger; Haushaltsdesinfektion; Backofen- & Grillreiniger; Tiergeruchs- & Fleckenentferner; Klarspüler; Edelstahlreiniger & -polituren; Toilettenreiniger; Wannen- & Kachelreiniger; Waschmaschinenreiniger
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาดในบ้าน > ผลิตภัณฑ์ทำความสะอาดบ้าน: สารทำความสะอาดอเนกประสงค์; ที่ทำความสะอาดพรม; ที่ล้างคราบน้ำและหินปูน; น้ำยาและสบู่ล้างจาน; สารทำความสะอาดเครื่องล้างจาน; ที่ทำความสะอาดผ้าและเครื่องเบาะ; ผลิตภัณฑ์ทำความสะอาดพื้น; สารทำความสะอาดและขัดเงาเฟอร์นิเจอร์; สารทำความสะอาดแก้วและพื้นผิว; ผลิตภัณฑ์กำจัดแบคทีเรียภายในบ้าน; สารทำความสะอาดเตาอบและเตาปิ้งย่าง; ผลิตภัณฑ์กำจัดกลิ่นและคราบจากสัตว์เลี้ยง; น้ำยาล้างคราบภาชนะ; สารทำความสะอาดและขัดเงาเหล็กกล้าไร้สนิม; สารทำความสะอาดโถส้วม; สารทำความสะอาดอ่างอาบน้ำและกระเบื้อง; ที่ทำความสะอาดเครื่องซักผ้า
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Čistiace prostriedky pre domácnosť > Čistiace prostriedky pre domácnosť: Univerzálne čistiace prostriedky; Čistiace prostriedky na koberce; Odstraňovače vodného kameňa a odvápňovače; Čistiaci prostriedok a mydlo na riad; Čistiace prostriedky do umývačiek riadu; Čistiace prostriedky na látky a čalúnenie; Prostriedky na umývanie podlahy; Čistiace prostriedky a leštidlá na nábytok; Čistiace prostriedky na sklo a povrchy; Dezinfekčné prostriedky pre domácnosť; Čistiace prostriedky na rúry a grily; Prípravky na odstraňovanie zápachu a špiny od domácich miláčikov; Oplachovacie prostriedky; Čistiace prostriedky a leštidlá na nehrdzavejúcu oceľ; Čistiace prostriedky na toaletné misy; Čistiace prostriedky na vane a dlaždice; Čistiace prostriedky na práčky
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Домакински почистващи консумативи > Домакински почистващи продукти: Универсални почистващи препарати; Препарати за почистване на килими; Препарати за премахване на варовик; Препарат за съдове и сапун; Почистващи препарати за съдомиялни; Препарати за почистване на тъкани и тапицерии; Продукти за почистване на подови настилки; Препарати за почистване и полиране на мебели; Препарати за почистване на стъкло и повърхности; Домакински дезинфектанти; Препарати за почистване на фурни и скари; Средства за премахване на миризми и петна от домашни любимци; Препарати за изплакване; Препарати за почистване и полиране на неръждаема стомана; Препарати за почистване на тоалетни чинии; Препарати за почистване на вани и плочки; Препарати за почистване на перални
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Ev Temizlik Malzemeleri > Ev Temizlik Ürünleri: Çok Amaçlı Temizleyiciler; Halı Temizleyiciler; Tufal ve Kireç Gidericiler; Bulaşık Deterjan ve Sabunları; Bulaşık Makinesi Deterjanları; Kumaş ve Döşeme Temizleyiciler; Zemin Temizleme Ürünleri; Mobilya Temizleyici ve Parlatıcıları; Cam ve Yüzey Temizleyiciler; Ev Dezenfektanları; Fırın ve Izgara Temizleyiciler; Evcil Hayvan Kokusu ve Lekesi Gidericiler; Parlatıcılar; Paslanmaz Çelik Temizleyiciler ve Parlatıcılar; Tuvalet Temizleyicileri; Küvet ve Karo Temizleyicileri; Çamaşır Makinesi Deterjanları
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Čisticí potřeby pro domácnost > Čisticí produkty pro domácnost: Univerzální čisticí prostředky; Čisticí prostředky na koberce; Odstraňovače vodního kamene a odvápňovače; Prostředky na mytí nádobí; Čističe na myčky nádobí; Čističe látek a čalounění; Čistící prostředky na podlahy; Čistící a leštící prostředky na nábytek; Čističe na sklo a jiné povrchy; Domácí dezinfekční prostředky; Čističe na trouby a grily; Odstraňovače skvrn a zápachu po zvířatech; Přípravky na oplachování nádobí; Čističe a politury na nerezovou ocel; Čističe na WC mísy; Čističe van a dlaždic; Čističe praček
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Rengöringsutrustning för hushåll > Rengöringsprodukter för hemmet: Universalrengöringsmedel; Mattrengöring; Avkalkning och kalkborttagningsmedel; Tvål och diskmedel; Rengöringsmedel för diskmaskiner; Rengöringsmedel för tyger och överdrag; Golvrengöringsprodukter; Rengöringsmedel och polermedel för möbler; Rengöringsmedel för glas och blanka ytor; Desinfektionsmedel för hemmet; Rengöringsmedel för ugnar; Borttagningsmedel för lukt och fläckar från husdjur; Disksköljmedel; Rengörings- och polermedel för rostfritt stål; Toalettrengöringsmedel; Badkars- och kakelrengöring; Rengöringsmedel för tvättmaskiner
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Είδη καθαρισμού οικίας > Προϊόντα καθαρισμού οικίας: Καθαριστικά γενικής χρήσης; Καθαριστικά χαλιών; Συσκευές αποκαθαλάτωσης & απασβέστωσης; Απορρυπαντικό & σαπούνι πιάτων; Καθαριστικά πλυντηρίου πιάτων; Καθαριστικά υφασμάτων & ταπετσαριών; Προϊόντα καθαρισμού δαπέδων; Καθαριστικά & γυαλιστικά επίπλων; Καθαριστικά τζαμιών & επιφανειών; Απολυμαντικά οικιακής χρήσης; Καθαριστικά φούρνων & σχαρών; Προϊόντα αφαίρεσης οσμών και λεκέδων από κατοικίδια; Βοηθήματα ξεβγάλματος; Καθαριστικά & γυαλιστικά από ανοξείδωτο χάλυβα; Καθαριστικά λεκάνης τουαλέτας; Καθαριστικά μπανιέρας & πλακιδίων; Καθαριστικά πλυντηρίων ρούχων
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Rengøringsmidler > Rengøringsartikler: Universalrengøring; Tæpperengøring; Kalkfjernere; Opvaskemiddel; Opvaskemaskinerens; Stof- og møbelrens; Gulvrengøringsprodukter; Møbelrens og pudsemiddel; Glas- og overfladerens; Desinfektionsmidler; Ovn- og grillrens; Lugt- og pletfjerner – kæledyr; Afspændingsmiddel; Rengøring og polering af rustfrit stål; Toiletrens; Badekar- og fliserengøring; Vaskemaskinerens
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Artigos de limpeza para o lar > Produtos de limpeza para o lar: Produtos de limpeza multifunções; Detergentes para alcatifas; Produtos anticalcários e descalcificantes; Detergente manual para louça; Produtos de limpeza da máquina de lavar louça; Produtos de limpeza para tecido e estofos; Produtos para limpeza do chão; Produtos de limpeza para o pó e polimento; Produtos de limpeza para vidro e superfícies; Produtos desinfetantes; Produtos de limpeza para forno e grelhador; Removedores de odores de animais de estimação e nódoas; Abrilhantadores; Produtos de limpeza e polimento para aço inoxidável; Produtos de limpeza para a sanita; Produtos de limpeza para banheira e azulejos; Produtos de limpeza para máquina de lavar a roupa
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 掃除用品 > 家庭用洗剤: 万能洗剤; カーペット用洗剤; 湯垢落とし、除石灰剤; 食器用洗剤; 食器洗浄機用洗剤; 布製品用洗剤; 床クリーナー; 家具クリーナー・艶出し剤; ガラスクリーナー; 家庭用殺菌消毒剤; オーブンクリーナー; ペットの匂い・汚れ除去剤; 食器洗浄機用乾燥仕上剤; ステンレスクリーナー・ポリッシュ; トイレ用洗剤; お風呂用洗剤; 洗濯槽クリーナー
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Productos de limpieza para el hogar > Productos para limpieza del hogar: Limpiadores multiusos; Productos de limpieza para alfombras; Desincrustadores y descalcificadores; Lavaplatos; Limpiadores de lavavajillas; Limpiadores de tejidos y tapizados; Productos de limpieza de pisos; Cera y productos de limpieza de muebles; Productos de limpieza para superficies y cristales; Desinfectantes domésticos; Limpiadores de hornos y parrillas; Quitamanchas y neutralizadores de olores de mascotas; Abrillantadores; Limpiadores y abrillantadores para acero inoxidable; Productos de limpieza para tazas de inodoro; Productos de limpieza para baños; Limpiadores para lavadoras
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Dụng cụ lau dọn gia dụng > Sản phẩm lau rửa gia dụng: Nước tẩy rửa đa năng; Chất tẩy rửa thảm; Chất cạo gỉ & vôi; Xà phòng và dung dịch rửa bát; Nước tẩy rửa máy rửa chén; Sản phẩm vệ sinh vải và bọc ghế; Sản phẩm lau sàn; Sản phẩm làm sạch và đánh bóng đồ đạc; Dung dịch vệ sinh kính và bề mặt; Thuốc diệt vi khuẩn gia dụng; Sản phẩm vệ sinh lò nướng và vỉ nướng; Sản phẩm làm sạch vết bẩn và khử mùi vật nuôi; Nước rửa; Nước tẩy rửa và đánh bóng xoong nồi; Sản phẩm vệ sinh bồn cầu; Sản phầm vệ sinh bồn tắm và gạch nhà vệ sinh; Nước tẩy rửa máy giặt
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Buitiniai valymo reikmenys > Buitinės valymo priemonės: Universalūs valikliai; Kilimų valikliai; Kalkių šalinimo priemonės; Indų ploviklis ir muilas; Indaplovių valikliai; Audinių ir apmušalų valikliai; Grindų valymo priemonės; Baldų valikliai ir poliruokliai; Stiklo ir paviršių valikliai; Buitinės dezinfekcijos priemonės; Orkaičių ir kepsninių valikliai; Naminių gyvūnų kvapo ir jų paliktų dėmių šalinimo priemonės; Skalavimo priemonės; Nerūdijančio plieno valikliai ir poliravimo priemonės; Klozetų valikliai; Vonios ir plytelių valikliai; Skalbyklių valikliai